Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the Sixty-eight Million Three Hundred Forty-eight Thousand
Five Hundred Fifty-eight Dollars ($68,348,558.00) appropriated to
the State Department of Health in Section 73 of Enrolled Senate Bill
No. 1177 of the 2nd Regular Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature, the sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be
transferred to the Barbara Weber Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis (ALS)
Grant Program Revolving Fund established in Section 1-580.2 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 27th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4029 Page 2